California, session 20252026, SB1188.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51750 of the Education Code is amended to read:51750. (a) The governing board or body of a local educational agency maintaining a secondary school may establish in its schoolsites courses in military science and tactics complying with the laws of the United States made and provided with reference to Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (JROTC) units in educational institutions.(b) A pupil enrolled in a school that establishes courses in military science and tactics pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be required to enroll in any course in military science and tactics.(c) (1) A local educational agency offering a JROTC program within any of its schools shall, consistent with Section 2031(f)(1) of Title 10 of the United States Code, ensure equal access to permit membership in the JROTC program for a homeschooled pupil who resides within the attendance area of the local educational agency and meets all applicable eligibility requirements for participation in the JROTC program other than enrollment in the school offering the JROTC program.(2)A local educational agency offering a JROTC program shall ensure equal access to the JROTC program for a pupil who resides within the attendance area of the local educational agency, is enrolled in a private school, independent study, or a public school other than the school offering the JROTC program, and meets all applicable eligibility requirements for participation in the program other than enrollment in the school offering the JROTC program.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “homeschooled pupil” has the same meaning as the term “homeschooled student” used in Section 2031(f)(1) of Title 10 of the United States Code.(d) The department shall make information about existing JROTC programs, including eligibility and application requirements for pupils described in subdivision (c), available on its internet website and distribute implementation guidance to local educational agencies on an annual basis.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: “local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.(1)“Ensure equal access to the JROTC program” means to provide the same opportunities in relation to the JROTC program as provided to the pupils enrolled in the school offering the program.(2)“Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.